Maryland, session 2026, SB0483.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0483*

SENATE BILL 483
10–301.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Court record” has the meaning stated in § 10–101 of this title.
(c) “Criminal justice unit” has the meaning stated in § 10–201 of this title.
(d) “Police record” has the meaning stated in § 10–101 of this title.
(e) “Shield” means to render a court record and police record relating to a
conviction of a crime inaccessible by members of the public.
10–112.1. 10–303.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “DISPOSITION” MEANS THE OUTCOME OF A CRIMINAL
CHARGE OR CASE RECORDED IN ELECTRONIC COURT RECORDS.
(II) “DISPOSITION” INCLUDES AN ACQUITTAL, A DISMISSAL, A
NOLLE PROSEQUI, A FINDING OF GUILTY, A PROBATION BEFORE JUDGMENT, A PLEA
OF GUILTY, A PLEA OF NOLO CONTENDERE, MARKING THE CHARGE “STET” ON THE
DOCKET, AND AN ORDER OF AN APPELLATE COURT ENDING A CRIMINAL CASE.
(III) “DISPOSITION” DOES NOT REFER TO THE OUTCOME OF A
CRIMINAL SENTENCE.
(3) “EXPUNGE” MEANS TO:
(I) REMOVE ALL REFERENCES TO A SPECIFIED CRIMINAL CASE
FROM THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY; AND
(II) REMOVE FROM PUBLIC VIEW ALL ELECTRONIC COURT
RECORDS RELATING TO THE CASE, WITHOUT NEEDING TO REDACT PHYSICAL OR
ELECTRONIC DOCUMENTS, RECORDINGS, OR AUDIO OR VISUAL MEDIA.
(B) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2028, THE DEPARTMENT AND THE JUDICIARY
SHALL EXPUNGE ALL CASES IN WHICH:
(1) (I) ALL CHARGES OR DISPOSITIONS IN THE CASE ARE LISTED
UNDER § 10–105(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE;

SENATE BILL 483 3
(II) THE CASE IS ELIGIBLE UNDER § 10–107 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
AND
(III) AT LEAST 3 YEARS HAVE PASSED SINCE THE DATE OF THE
DISPOSITION OF THE CASE; OR
(2) (I) ANY CONVICTIONS IN THE CASE ARE MISDEMEANOR
CONVICTIONS LISTED UNDER § 10–110(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE, OTHER THAN:
1. ASSAULT IN THE SECOND DEGREE UNDER § 3–203 OF
THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE; AND
2. ANY CHARGE MARKED IN ELECTRONIC COURT
RECORDS AS A DOMESTICALLY RELATED CRIME UNDER § 6–233 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(II) THE CASE IS ELIGIBLE UNDER §§ 10–107 AND 10–110(D)(2)
AND (3) OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(III) AT LEAST 7 YEARS HAVE PASSED SINCE THE DISPOSITION OF
THE CASE, EXCEPT THAT IF THE PERSON IS CONVICTED OF A NEW CRIME DURING
THE 7–YEAR PERIOD, THE ORIGINAL CONVICTION OR CONVICTIONS ARE NOT
ELIGIBLE FOR EXPUNGEMENT UNLESS THE NEW CONVICTION BECOMES ELIGIBLE
FOR EXPUNGEMENT.
(C) (1) BEGINNING AUGUST 1, 2028, THE JUDICIARY SHALL, ONCE PER
MONTH, IDENTIFY ALL CASES THAT ARE NEWLY ELIGIBLE FOR EXPUNGEMENT
BASED ON THE CRITERIA SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) PROMPTLY AFTER MAKING EACH DETERMINATION REQUIRED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE JUDICIARY SHALL
ELECTRONICALLY NOTIFY THE DEPARTMENT OF ALL CASES THAT ARE NEWLY
ELIGIBLE FOR EXPUNGEMENT.
(3) WITHIN ONE MONTH OF THE NOTIFICATION REQUIRED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT AND THE JUDICIARY
SHALL EXPUNGE ALL NEWLY ELIGIBLE CASES.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “TECHNICALLY ELIGIBLE FOR EXPUNGEMENT”
MEANS THAT, BASED ON THE NATURE OF A CHARGE OR CONVICTION AND THE
RELEVANT TIME THAT HAS ELAPSED, A PERSON WOULD BE ELIGIBLE TO FILE A
PETITION FOR EXPUNGEMENT UNDER SUBTITLE 1 OF THIS TITLE.

SENATE BILL 483
(B) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2028, THE JUDICIARY SHALL SHIELD ALL CASES
IN WHICH ALL CHARGES IN THE CASE ARE TECHNICALLY ELIGIBLE FOR
EXPUNGEMENT.
(C) (1) BEGINNING AUGUST 1, 2028, THE JUDICIARY SHALL, ONCE PER
MONTH, IDENTIFY ALL CASES IN WHICH ALL CHARGES IN THE CASE ARE NEWLY
TECHNICALLY ELIGIBLE FOR EXPUNGEMENT.
(2) WITHIN 1 MONTH OF IDENTIFYING A CASE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE JUDICIARY SHALL SHIELD THE CASE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.